Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Meetings

48-17-101. Annual meeting.

Unless directors are elected by written consent in lieu of an annual meeting as permitted by § 48-17-104, a corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated in, or fixed in accordance with, the bylaws.

Annual shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation's bylaws does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.01; 2012, ch. 1051, § 23.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Nonprofit corporations, members and memberships, title 48, ch. 56.

Law Reviews.

A Theory of Shareholder Activism and its Place in Corporate Law, 82 Tenn. L. Rev. 791 (2015).

48-17-102. Special meeting.

A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the charter or bylaws; or

Unless the charter otherwise provides, if the holders of at least ten percent (10%) of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation's secretary one (1) or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

If not otherwise fixed under § 48-17-103 or § 48-17-107, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting is the date the first shareholder signs the demand.

Special shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by § 48-17-105(c) may be conducted at a special shareholders' meeting.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.02; 1989, ch. 451, § 10.

48-17-103. Court-ordered meeting.

A court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where a corporation's principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may summarily order a meeting to be held on application of:

Any shareholder of the corporation entitled to participate in an annual meeting, if an annual meeting was not held within the earlier of six (6) months after the end of the corporation's fiscal year or fifteen (15) months after its last annual meeting; or

A shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under § 48-17-102, if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within one (1) month after the date the demand was delivered to the corporation's secretary; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting (or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters) and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.03; 1987, ch. 273, § 31.

48-17-104. Action without meeting.

Action required or permitted by chapters 11-27 of this title to be taken at a shareholders' meeting may be taken without a meeting. If all shareholders entitled to vote on the action consent to taking such action without a meeting, the affirmative vote of the number of shares that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting is the act of the shareholders. The action must be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each shareholder entitled to vote on the action in one (1) or more counterparts, indicating each signing shareholder's vote or abstention on the action, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

The charter may provide that any action required or permitted by chapters 11-27 of this title to be taken at a shareholders' meeting may be taken without a meeting, and without prior notice, if consents in writing setting forth the action so taken are signed by the holders of outstanding shares having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be required to authorize or take the action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on the action were present and voted. The written consent shall bear the date of signature of the shareholder who signs the consent and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

If not otherwise determined under § 48-17-103 or § 48-17-107, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to take action without a meeting is the date the first shareholder signs the consent under subsection (a).

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document. Unless the charter, bylaws or a resolution of the board of directors provides for a reasonable delay to permit tabulation of written consents, the action taken by written consent shall be effective when written consents signed by sufficient shareholders to take the action are delivered to the corporation.

If chapters 11-27 of this title or the charter requires that notice of proposed action be given to nonvoting shareholders and the action is to be taken by consent of the voting shareholders, then the corporation must give its nonvoting shareholders written notice of the proposed action at least ten (10) days before the action is taken. The notice must contain or be accompanied by the same material that under chapters 11-27 of this title would have been required to be sent to nonvoting shareholders in a notice of meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

If action is taken by less than unanimous written consent of the voting shareholders, the corporation must give its nonconsenting voting shareholders written notice of the action not more than ten (10) days after:

Written consents sufficient to take the action have been delivered to the corporation; or

Such later date that tabulation of consents is completed pursuant to an authorization under subsection (d).

The notice must reasonably describe the action taken and contain or be accompanied by the same material that chapters 11-27 of this title would require to be sent to voting shareholders in a notice of a meeting at which the action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

The notice requirements in subsections (e) and (f) shall not delay the effectiveness of actions taken by written consent, and a failure to comply with such notice requirements shall not invalidate actions taken by written consent; provided, that this subsection (g) shall not be deemed to limit judicial power to fashion any appropriate remedy in favor of a shareholder adversely affected by a failure to give such notice within the required time period.

An electronic transmission may be used to consent to an action, if the electronic transmission contains or is accompanied by information from which the corporation can determine the date on which the electronic transmission was signed and that the electronic transmission was authorized by the shareholder, the shareholder's agent or the shareholder's attorney-in-fact.

Delivery of a written consent to the corporation under this section is delivery to the corporation's registered agent at its registered office (or to a designated mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the registered agent's registered office) or to the secretary of the corporation at its principal office (or to a designated mailing address such as a post office box if the United States postal service does not deliver to the corporation's principal office).

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.04; 2012, ch. 1051, § 24; 2015, ch. 60, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-707, 5-902.

48-17-105. Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall notify shareholders of the date, time, and place of each annual and special shareholders' meeting no fewer than ten (10) days nor more than two (2) months before the meeting date. Unless chapters 11-27 of this title or the charter requires otherwise, the corporation is required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.

Unless chapters 11-27 of this title or the charter requires otherwise, notice of an annual meeting need not include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Notice of a special meeting must include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

If not otherwise fixed under § 48-17-103 or § 48-17-107, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders' meeting is the close of business on the day before the first notice is mailed or otherwise dispatched to shareholders.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special shareholders' meeting is adjourned to a different date, time, or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place if the new date, time, or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under § 48-17-107, however, notice of the adjourned meeting must be given under this section to persons who are shareholders as of the new record date.

A certificate of the secretary or other person giving the notice, or of a transfer agent of the corporation, that the notice required by this section has been given shall, in the absence of fraud, be prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.05; 1994, ch. 776, § 21.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-811, 5-1107, 5-1108.

48-17-106. Waiver of notice.

A shareholder may waive any notice required by chapters 11-27 of this title, the charter, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver must be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A shareholder's attendance at a meeting:

Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting (or promptly upon the shareholder's arrival) objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

Waives objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.06.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1302.

48-17-107. Record date.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for one (1) or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to notice of a shareholders' meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix a future date as the record date.

A record date fixed under this section may not be more than seventy (70) days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or vote at a shareholders' meeting is effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it must do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than four (4) months after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than four (4) months after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.07.

48-17-108. Waiver or approval by fiduciaries.

Each fiduciary, including such acting as executor, administrator, guardian, committee, agent, or trustee, who is a shareholder of record, whether the corporation issuing such shares is foreign or domestic, may waive notice or lapse of time pursuant to § 48-17-106 and may consent to the taking of any corporate action pursuant to § 48-17-104.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 7.08.

48-17-109. Shareholder meetings through special communication.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, the corporation may permit any or all shareholders to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all shareholders participating may simultaneously hear each other during the meeting. A shareholder who participates in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

Acts 1994, ch. 776, § 22.

48-17-110. Conduct of the meeting.

At each meeting of shareholders, a chair shall preside. The chair shall be appointed as provided in the bylaws or, in the absence of such provision, by the board.

The chair, unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, shall determine the order of business and shall have the authority to establish rules for the conduct of the meeting.

Any rules adopted for, and the conduct of, the meeting shall be fair to shareholders.

The chair of the meeting shall announce at the meeting when the polls close for each matter voted upon. If no announcement is made, the polls shall be deemed to have closed upon the final adjournment of the meeting. After the polls close, no ballots, proxies or votes nor any revocations or changes thereto may be accepted.

Acts 2012, ch. 1051, § 27.